Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1415
Annual report; expenses; appropriation.

The dock board shall annually make to the county board or the governing body of the municipality, as the case may be, a full and complete report of its activities, including a statement of the commerce passing through the port and a report of the receipts and disbursements made by or on account of said board. The board may, at such times as it may deem necessary, file with the county board or governing body, as the case may be, an estimate of the amounts necessary to be appropriated by the county board or the governing body to defray the expense of the board. The county board or the governing body of such municipality is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to appropriate from its general fund and to place at the disposal of the board an amount sufficient to defray such expense.

Laws 1937, c. 37, § 3, p. 172;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-2003;

R.S.1943, § 18-714;

Laws 1967, c. 84, § 12, p. 266;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-714.